Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5307.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 40118. (1) An individual who violates this part, an order or interim order issued under this part, or a condition of a permit issued under this part, except for a violation specified in subsections (2) to (19), is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $50.00 or more than $500.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. In addition, a permit issued by the department under this part must be revoked pursuant to in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (2) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the possession or taking of any game, except deer, bear, wild turkey, wolf, waterfowl, moose, or elk, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $100.00 or more than $1,000.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or subsection (19), an individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the possession or taking of deer, bear, wild turkey, or wolf is guilty of a misdemeanor. and The court may be imprisoned sentence the individual to imprisonment for not more than 90 days, shall be fined impose a fine of not less than $200.00 or more than $1,000.00, and shall be ordered order the individual to pay the costs of prosecution. An individual shall not be punished under this subsection for lawfully removing, capturing, or destroying a wolf under 2008 PA 290, MCL 324.95151 to 324.95155, or 2008 PA 318, MCL 324.95161 to 324.95167. (4) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the possession or taking of elk is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 180 days or a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $2,000.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (5) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the possession or taking of moose is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year and a fine of not less than $1,000.00 or more than $5,000.00, and the costs of prosecution. (6) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the possession or taking of waterfowl is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $250.00 or more than $500.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the possession or taking of waterfowl a second or subsequent time is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of $500.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (7) An individual sentenced under subsection (3), (14), or (15) shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt during the remainder of the year in which convicted and the next 3 succeeding calendar years. An individual sentenced under subsection (11) shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt during the remainder of the year in which convicted and the next succeeding calendar year, or longer in the discretion of the court. (8) In addition to the penalties provided for violating this part or an order issued under this part, an individual convicted of the illegal killing, possessing, purchasing, or selling of a bear or an antlered white-tailed deer is subject to the following penalties: (a) For a first offense, the individual shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt for an additional 2 calendar years after the penalties imposed under subsection (7). (b) For a second or subsequent offense, the individual shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt for an additional 7 calendar years after the penalties imposed under subsection (7). (9) In addition to the penalties provided for violating this part or an order issued under this part, an individual convicted of the illegal killing, possessing, purchasing, or selling of a wild turkey shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt for an additional 2 calendar years after the penalties imposed under subsection (7). (10) An individual sentenced under subsection (4) or (5) is subject to the following penalties: (a) For a first offense, the individual shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt for the remainder of the year in which convicted and the next 15 succeeding calendar years. (b) For a second offense, the individual shall not secure or possess a license of any kind to hunt for the remainder of that individual's life. (11) An individual who violates section 40113(1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $100.00 or more than $500.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (12) An individual who violates section 40113(2) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $50.00 or more than $500.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (13) An individual who violates section 40113(3) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $100.00 or more than $500.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (14) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the taking or possession of an animal that has been designated by the department to be a protected animal, other than an animal that appears on a list prepared under section 36505, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $100.00 or more than $1,000.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (15) An individual who buys or sells game or a protected animal in violation of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both, for the first offense, and is guilty of a felony for each subsequent offense. (16) An individual who willfully violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part by using an illegally constructed snare or cable restraint is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of $1,000.00 for the first illegally constructed snare or cable restraint and $250.00 for each subsequent illegally constructed snare or cable restraint, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (17) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding the importation of a cervid carcass or parts of a cervid carcass, other than hides, deboned meat, quarters or other parts of a cervid that do not have any part of the spinal column or head attached, finished taxidermy products, cleaned teeth, antlers, or antlers attached to a skullcap cleaned of brain and muscle tissue, from another state or province is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $2,000.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (18) If an individual is convicted of a violation of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part and it is alleged in the complaint and proved or admitted at trial or ascertained by the court after conviction that the individual had been previously convicted 2 times within the preceding 5 years for a violation of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part, the individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 180 days or a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $2,000.00, or both, and the costs of prosecution. (19) An individual who violates a provision of this part or an order or interim order issued under this part regarding any of the following is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $150.00: (a) Attaching that individual's name, driver license number, or sportcard number to a ground blind. (b) Attaching that individual's name, driver license number, or sportcard number to a tree stand, scaffold, or raised platform. (c) Supplemental feeding of deer. (d) Reporting of a deer harvest or retention of a deer harvest confirmation number.